West Virginia, session 2026, HB4045.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 6O. The Rossi act. §46A-6O-1. The Rossi act; mandate; enforcement. (a) This act shall be cited as "The Rossi Act".(b) Notwithstanding any provision of code to the contrary, including any provision of §39A-1-1 et seq. of this code, an entity, business, corporation, company, or organization that provides goods, services, or utilities to an individual in West Virginia shall allow changes to be made to an electronic or online account for said goods, services, or utilities by telephone or by mail with necessary identity verification measures.(c) Failure of an entity, business, corporation, company or organization to comply with subsection (b) constitutes a violation of the West Virginia Consumer Credit and Protection Act of §46A-6-1 et seq. of this code and is subject to enforcement by the Attorney General.